Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 2
HIGHWAY USERS TAX FUND

43-4-201. Highway users tax fund - created.

The highway users tax fund is hereby created in the state treasurer's office.

The unrestricted year-end balance of the highway users tax fund, created pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), for the 1991-92 fiscal year shall constitute a reserve, as defined in section 24-77-102 (12), C.R.S., and, for purposes of section 24-77-103, C.R.S.:

Any moneys credited to the highway users tax fund in any subsequent fiscal year shall be included in state fiscal year spending, as defined in section 24-77-102 (17), C.R.S., for such fiscal year; and

Any transfers or expenditures from the highway users tax fund in any subsequent fiscal year shall not be included in state fiscal year spending, as defined in section 24-77-102 (17), C.R.S., for such fiscal year.

Repealed.

The general assembly shall not make any annual appropriation (whether by regular, special, or supplementary appropriation) or any statutory distribution from the highway users tax fund for any purpose or purposes in a total amount that is:
(3) (a) (I) The general assembly shall not make any annual appropriation (whether by regular, special, or supplementary appropriation) or any statutory distribution from the highway users tax fund for any purpose or purposes in a total amount that is:

More than twenty-three percent of the net revenue of said fund for the prior fiscal year;

Commencing in the fiscal year 1995-96, and ending in the fiscal year 2012-13, more than a six percent increase over the appropriation to the department of public safety for the Colorado state patrol and to the department of revenue for the ports of entry division for the prior fiscal year; except in fiscal years 2009-10, 2010-11, and 2011-12, more than a six percent increase over the appropriation to the department of public safety for the Colorado state patrol, to the department of revenue for the ports of entry division, and to the department of revenue for the division of motor vehicles pursuant to sub-subparagraph (C) of subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (a) for the prior fiscal year; or

Commencing in the fiscal year 2013-14, more than a six percent increase over the appropriation to the Colorado state patrol for the prior fiscal year, plus, for the fiscal years 2016-17, 2017-18, 2018-19, and 2022-23 only, the amount appropriated to the department of revenue for use by the division of motor vehicles pursuant to subsection (3)(a)(III)(C) of this section.

(I.1) Repealed.

The general assembly shall not make any annual appropriation or statutory distribution from the highway users tax fund except as follows:

To the office of transportation safety;

To the transportation development division;

To the department of labor and employment for costs related to the oil inspection program;

To the department of personnel for costs related to telecommunications support;

To the department of corrections for costs related to the production of license plates by the division of correctional industries;

To the department of revenue for highway-related programs, including capital construction costs;

To the department of public safety for highway-related programs, including capital construction costs;

Repealed.

To the department of personnel for costs related to the salaries and benefits of the departments or programs listed in sub-subparagraphs (A) to (G) of this subparagraph (II);

To the department of local affairs for the provision of disaster emergency services that relate to the transportation of hazardous materials.

Repealed.

and (B) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-274), ch. 210, p. 955, § 9, effective May 1, 2009.)

(C) The general assembly shall not make any annual appropriation or statutory distribution from the highway users tax fund for the fiscal year 1997-98 or for any succeeding fiscal year authorized by subsection (3)(a)(II) of this section, excluding the annual appropriation or statutory distribution to the Colorado state patrol and, through the fiscal year 2011-12 only, the ports of entry section and excluding any appropriation to the department of revenue for the fiscal years 2008-09, 2009-10, 2010-11, 2011-12, 2016-17, 2017-18, 2018-19, and 2022-23 for expenses incurred in connection with the administration of article 2 of title 42 by the division of motor vehicles within the department.

(D) For any annual appropriation or statutory distribution authorized by subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a) but not funded from the highway users tax fund, the general assembly shall determine the amount necessary to be expended for those purposes and shall make an annual appropriation as necessary from the general fund.

In addition to any other allocations required by this article, there shall be allocated from the highway users tax fund on or after July 31 for fiscal year 1995-96 and each succeeding fiscal year an amount equal to that not annually appropriated or statutorily distributed pursuant to sub-subparagraph (C) of subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (a). The moneys shall be allocated in accordance with the provisions of section 43-4-205 (6)(b).

Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, the general assembly may make an annual appropriation or statutory distribution from the highway users tax fund to the department of revenue for the data collection services provided for under section 39-27-109.7, C.R.S.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, subject to the limitations specified in section 40-29-116 (2), C.R.S., for the 2016-17 fiscal year only, the general assembly may make an appropriation from the highway users tax fund to the highway-rail crossing signalization fund created in section 40-29-116 (1), C.R.S.

The balance of net revenues shall be paid to the state highway fund, counties, and municipalities pursuant to sections 43-4-206 to 43-4-208.

Any additional moneys in the highway users tax fund which are made available for distribution as a result of the limitation on appropriations or statutory distributions from the highway users tax fund imposed by paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall be allocated in accordance with the provisions of section 43-4-205 (6)(b).

Source:

L. 53:

p. 502, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 120-12-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-12-1.

L. 65:

p. 928, § 2.

L. 79:

(3) added, p. 1604, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

(3)(c) added, p. 63, § 18, effective August 1.

L. 90:

(3)(a) amended, p. 1828, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(3)(a)(II)(I) amended, p. 1018, § 1, effective May 16; (3)(a)(II)(A) and (3)(a)(II)(B) amended, p. 1126, § 199, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(3)(a)(II)(H) and (3)(a)(II)(I) amended and (3)(a)(II)(J) added, p. 1043, § 11, effective March 12.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1510, § 12, effective June 6.

L. 95:

(3)(a)(I)(B) amended and (3)(a)(I.1), (3)(a)(III), and (3)(a)(IV) added, p. 1299, § 1, effective June 5; (3)(a)(II)(D) amended, p. 668, § 111, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(3)(a)(I.1), (3)(a)(III)(B), and (3)(a)(III)(C) amended, p. 1552, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(3)(a)(II)(I), (3)(a)(II)(J), and (3)(a)(III)(C) amended and (3)(a)(II)(K) added, p. 1061, § 4, effective June 1; (3)(a)(V) added, p. 1040, § 13, July 1.

L. 2000:

(3)(a)(V) amended, p. 1938, § 21, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(3)(a)(I)(B) amended and (3)(a)(II)(L) added, pp. 6, 7, §§ 1, 2, effective March 5; (2) and (3)(a)(II)(H) repealed, p. 1700, § 8, effective May 14; (3)(a)(I)(B) and (3)(a)(III)(C) amended and (3)(a)(II)(M) added, pp. 1485, 1486, §§ 1, 3, 2, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(3)(a)(II)(K) amended, p. 1212, § 104, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

(3)(a)(I)(B), (3)(a)(II)(M), and (3)(a)(III)(C) amended, p. 1509, § 1, effective June 9; (3)(a)(I)(B), (3)(a)(II)(M), and (3)(a)(III)(C) amended, p. 18, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(3)(a)(II)(K) amended, p. 1515, § 83, effective June 1.

L. 2009:

IP(3)(a)(I), (3)(a)(I)(B), (3)(a)(III)(A), (3)(a)(III)(B), (3)(a)(III)(C), and (3)(a)(IV) amended, (SB 09-274), ch. 210, p. 955, § 9, effective May 1.

L. 2010:

(3)(a)(III)(C) amended, (HB 10-1387), ch. 205, p. 890, § 8, effective May 5.

L. 2011:

(3)(a)(I)(B) and (3)(a)(III)(C) amended, (HB 11-1161), ch. 64, p. 166, § 1, effective March 25.

L. 2012:

(3)(a)(I)(B), (3)(a)(I.1), and (3)(a)(III)(C) amended and (3)(a)(I)(C) added, (HB 12-1019), ch. 135, p. 473, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(3)(a)(I)(C) and (3)(a)(III)(C) amended and (3)(a)(I.1) repealed, (HB 16-1415), ch. 139, p. 414, § 6, effective May 4; (3)(a)(VI) added, (SB 16-087), ch. 217, p. 832, § 3, effective June 6.

L. 2022:

(3)(a)(I)(C) and (3)(a)(III)(C) amended, (HB 22-1338), ch. 134, p. 906, § 2, effective April 25.

43-4-202. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Net revenue" means the amount derived from a tax or fee after paying refunds.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 502, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 120-12-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-12-2.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 1604, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 80:

(2) added, p. 729, § 31, effective May 1.

L. 85:

(2) repealed, p. 288, § 8, effective May 23.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 1555, § 5, effective July 1.

43-4-203. Sources of revenue.

All net revenue from the following sources shall be paid into and credited to the highway users tax fund as soon as it is received:

From the imposition of any excise tax on motor fuel;

From the imposition of annual registration fees on drivers, motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers, except as provided in section 42-3-304 (19), C.R.S.;

From the imposition of passenger-mile taxes on vehicles or any fee or payment substituted therefor;

Repealed.

From interest or income earned on the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund;

From the imposition of electric motor vehicle road usage equalization fees pursuant to section 42-3-304 (25)(a.5); and

From the imposition of road usage fees pursuant to section 43-4-217 (3) and (4).

Source:

L. 53:

p. 502, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 120-12-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-12-3.

L. 77:

(1)(d) added, p. 1887, § 2, effective June 9.

L. 89:

(1)(d) repealed, p. 1600, § 23, effective January 1, 1990; (1)(c) amended, p. 1600, § 21, effective July 1, 1993.

L. 2001:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1022, § 8, effective June 5.

L. 2005:

(1)(e) added, p. 139, § 1, effective April 5; (1)(b) amended, p. 1184, § 38, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

IP(1) amended and (1)(f) and (1)(g) added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1417, § 32, effective June 17.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2001 act amending subsection (1)(b), see section 1 of chapter 278, Session Laws of Colorado 2001. For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

43-4-204. Appropriation.

All moneys in the highway users tax fund are appropriated for the acquisition of rights-of-way for, and the construction, engineering, safety, reconstruction, improvement, repair, maintenance, and administration of, the state highway system, the county highway systems, the city street systems, and other public roads and highways of the state in accordance with the provisions of this part 2.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 502, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 120-12-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-12-4.

L. 65:

p. 929, § 3.

43-4-205. Allocation of fund.

The moneys in the highway users tax fund shall be apportioned monthly. The apportionment may be made by the state treasurer based upon estimates from the department of revenue on current monthly collections of highway users taxes, with monthly reconciliation of the state, county, and municipal accounts in each successive month. The department of revenue shall provide estimates to the state treasurer by the seventh working day of each month. The state treasurer shall apportion the funds within five working days of receiving estimates from the department of revenue.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Revenues raised by the excise tax imposed on gasoline and special fuel pursuant to sections 39-27-102 and 39-27-102.5, C.R.S., equal to the first seven cents per gallon of such tax shall be placed in the highway users tax fund to be allocated as follows:

Sixty-five percent of such revenue shall be paid to the state highway fund and shall be expended as provided in section 43-4-206.

Twenty-six percent of such revenue shall be paid to the county treasurers of the respective counties, subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, and shall be allocated and expended as provided in section 43-4-207.

Nine percent of such revenue shall be paid to cities and incorporated towns within the limits of the respective counties, subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, and shall be allocated and expended as provided in section 43-4-208 (2).

(5.5) The following highway users tax fund revenues shall be allocated and expended in accordance with the formula specified in subsection (5) of this section:

Revenues from fines, penalties, or forfeitures that are credited to the fund pursuant to sections 18-4-509 (2)(a), 39-27-104 (1)(g), 42-1-217 (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (1)(e), and (2), 42-4-225 (3), and 42-4-235 (2)(a);

Revenues from motor vehicle license plate, identification plate, and placard fees that are credited to the fund pursuant to section 42-4-202 (4)(d) and article 3 of title 42, C.R.S.;

Revenues from driver's license fees, motor vehicle title and registration fees, and motorist insurance identification fees that are credited to the fund pursuant to sections 42-2-132 (4)(b), 42-3-304 (18)(d)(I), and 42-3-306 (6) and (7), including any of those fees that are paid by the owner of special mobile machinery that is covered by a registration exempt certificate issued by the department in accordance with section 42-3-107 (16)(g);

Revenues from the imposition of passenger-mile taxes on vehicles, any additional penalties or interest imposed thereon, or any fee or payment substituted therefor that is imposed pursuant to sections 42-3-304 (13), 42-3-306 (11)(a) and (11)(b), and 42-3-308 (5), C.R.S., and credited to the fund pursuant to section 43-4-203 (1)(c);

Revenues from sales of abandoned motor vehicles that are credited to the fund pursuant to sections 42-4-1809 (2)(d) and 42-4-2108 (2)(c), C.R.S.;

Revenues from fees that are credited to the fund pursuant to section 42-3-311 (1), C.R.S., and that exceed the amount of appropriations made from the fund pursuant to those sections for the purpose of defraying specified administrative expenses;

Revenues from interest or income earned on the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund; and

Revenues from any source that are credited to the fund, but not to any specific account within the fund, the allocation and expenditure of which is not otherwise specified by law.

Revenue raised by the excise tax imposed on gasoline and special fuel pursuant to sections

39-27-102

and

39-27-102.5

in excess of seven cents per gallon of tax shall be placed in the highway users tax fund to be allocated as follows; except that revenue raised by the excise tax imposed on gasoline in excess of eighteen cents per gallon of tax shall be allocated according to subsection (6)(b) of this section:

Sixteen percent of such revenue shall be deposited in a special account within the highway users tax fund until July 1, 1997, and shall be expended only for highway bridge repair, replacement, or posting, pursuant to provisions of paragraph (a) of subsection (7) of this section.

The remaining balance of such revenue may be expended only for improvements to highways within the state, including new construction, safety improvements, maintenance, and capacity improvements, and for other transportation-related projects to the extent authorized by subsection (6.8) of this section and sections

43-4-206

(3),

43-4-207

(1), and

43-4-208 (1)

, and may not be expended for administrative purposes. Such revenue is allocated as follows:

Sixty percent of such revenue shall be paid to the state highway fund and shall be expended as provided in section

43-4-206

.

Twenty-two percent of such revenue shall be paid to the county treasurers of the respective counties, subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, and shall be allocated and expended as provided in section

43-4-207

.

Eighteen percent of such revenue shall be paid to the cities and incorporated towns, subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, and shall be allocated and expended as provided in section

43-4-208 (2)(b)

and (6)(a).

(6.3) Revenues from the surcharges, fees, and fines credited to the highway users tax fund pursuant to section

43-4-804 (1)

shall be allocated and expended in accordance with the formula specified in paragraph (b) of subsection (6) of this section.

(6.4) Money transferred from the general fund to the highway users tax fund pursuant to section

24-75-219

(5)(a)(II) and (5)(b)(II) is allocated and expended as follows:

Fifty percent of the money is paid to the county treasurers of the respective counties, subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, and allocated and expended as provided in section 43-4-207; and

Fifty percent of the money is paid to the cities and incorporated towns, subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, and allocated and expended as provided in section

43-4-208 (2)

and (6)(a).

(6.5) (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (6.4) and (6.7) of this section, the revenue accrued to and transferred to the highway users tax fund pursuant to section

24-75-219

or

39-26-123 (4)(a)

or appropriated to the highway users tax fund pursuant to House Bill 02-1389, enacted in 2002, must be paid to the state highway fund for allocation to the department of transportation and expended as provided in section

43-4-206 (2)

.

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2005, p. 296, § 61, effective August 8, 2005.)

Repealed.

(6.6) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-228), ch. 410, p. 2270, § 24, effective July 1, 2009.)

(6.7) Money transferred from the general fund to the highway users tax fund pursuant to section

24-75-219 (5)

(b.5) must be allocated and expended in accordance with the formula specified in subsection (6)(b) of this section.

(6.8) (a) Revenue from the electric motor vehicle fee, the electric motor vehicle road usage equalization fee, and the commercial electric motor vehicle fee imposed pursuant to section

42-3-304

(25) that is credited to the highway users tax fund as required by section

42-3-304

(25)(a), (25)(a.5), and (25)(a.7) and revenue from the road usage fees imposed pursuant to section

43-4-217 (3)

and (4) that is credited to the highway users tax fund as required by section

43-4-217 (8)

must be allocated and expended in accordance with the formula specified in subsection (6)(b) of this section.

Revenue from the retail delivery fee imposed pursuant to section

43-4-218 (3)

that is credited to the highway users tax fund as required by section

43-4-218 (5)(a)(I)

must be allocated and expended as follows:

Forty percent must be paid to the state highway fund and expended as provided in section 43-4-206;

Thirty-three percent must be paid to the county treasurers of the respective counties, subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, and allocated and expended as provided in section 43-4-207; and

Twenty-seven percent must be paid to the cities and incorporated towns, subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, and must be allocated and expended as provided in section

43-4-208 (2)(b)

and (6)(a).

Revenue from the retail delivery fee may be expended for the purposes specified in subsection (6)(b) of this section and may also be expended for transit-related projects needed to integrate different transportation modes within a multimodal transportation system.

Money received by the state from the federal coronavirus state fiscal recovery fund and transferred to the highway users tax fund pursuant to section

24-75-219 (7)

(a)(III) and money transferred from the general fund to the highway users tax fund pursuant to section

24-75-219 (7)

(b.5)(II) must be allocated and expended as follows:

Fifty-five percent must be paid to the county treasurers of the respective counties, subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, and allocated and expended as provided in section 43-4-207;

Forty-five percent must be paid to the cities and incorporated towns, subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, and must be allocated and expended as provided in section

43-4-208 (2)

(b) and (6)(a).

Revenues accumulated in the special account for highway bridges, as provided in paragraph (a) of subsection (6) of this section, shall be allocated at least once each year among state, counties, and municipal highway systems based on total cost needs under the criteria developed by means of the most current report of the federal bridge inventory program. For the fiscal year commencing on July 1, 1981, the allocation shall be determined in accordance with needs developed by October 1, 1981. In subsequent fiscal years, the allocation shall be determined in accordance with needs reports available on January 1, 1982, and January 1 of each subsequent year, with the allocation amounts to be effective on July 1 of each year. After allocation of the state share of the special bridge account, the share for the counties and municipalities shall be allocated, subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, based upon need as determined by the special highway committee which shall be composed of four representatives each from counties and municipalities. Allocations to local governments shall require a minimum of twenty percent of local matching funds from revenues other than the special bridge account within the highway users tax fund.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

All of the additional revenues which are credited to the highway users tax fund as a result of the enactment of House Bill No. 1012 at the first extraordinary session of the fifty-seventh general assembly shall be expended only for improvements to highways within the state, including new construction, safety improvements, maintenance, and capacity improvements. No moneys shall be expended for administrative purposes.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 503, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 120-12-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-12-5.

L. 65:

p. 929, § 4.

L. 75:

(2) amended, p. 1575, § 1, effective March 26.

L. 79:

(3) and (4) added, pp. 1470, 1471, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(5) to (7) added, p. 1895, § 5, effective June 19.

L. 84:

(1) amended, p. 1026, § 3, effective March 16.

L. 86:

(6)(a) and (7)(b) amended, p. 1211, § 1, effective April 3; (2.5) added and IP(6)(b) amended, pp. 1120, 1134, §§ 21, 11, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(3) and (4) repealed and (8) to (12) added, pp. 1558, 1554, 1555, §§ 10, 3, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(2.5) repealed, p. 1434, § 24, effective June 11.

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

(13) added, p. 67, § 27, effective August 1.

L. 90:

IP(6) amended, p. 1829, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(6)(a) and (7)(b) amended, p. 1341, § 1, effective March 24.

L. 93:

(2), (5)(b), (5)(c), (6)(b)(II), (6)(b)(III), and (7)(a) amended, p. 1516, § 20, effective June 6.

L. 95:

(2) amended, p. 1300, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 97:

(6.5) added, p. 1533, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(6.5)(b) amended, p. 906, § 4, effective May 26.

L. 99:

(6.5)(b) repealed, p. 562, § 2, effective May 7.

L. 2000:

IP(5) and IP(6) amended, p. 1938, § 22, effective October 1; (6.5)(a) amended and (6.5)(c) added, p. 1361, § 47, effective July 1, 2001; (6.5)(a) amended and (6.5)(d) added, p. 1428, § 4, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2002:

(6.5)(a) and IP(6.5)(c) amended, p. 146, § 3, effective March 27; (6.6) added, p. 738, § 8, effective August 7; (6.6) added, p. 718, § 8, effective August 7.

L. 2003:

(2) repealed, p. 1701, § 9, effective May 14.

L. 2005:

(5.5) added, p. 139, § 2, effective April 5; (6.5)(a) and (6.5)(c) amended, p. 296, § 61, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(5.5)(b), (5.5)(c), (5.5)(d), and (5.5)(f) amended, p. 1515, § 84, effective June 1; (6.5)(a) amended, p. 1604, § 6, effective July 2.

L. 2007:

(5.5)(b) amended, p. 1574, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(6.3) added, (SB 09-108), ch. 5, p. 55, § 18, effective March 2; (5.5)(f) amended, (SB 09-274), ch. 210, p. 957, § 10, effective May 1; (6.5)(a) and (6.6) amended, (SB 09-228), ch. 410, p. 2270, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(5.5)(c) amended and (6.5)(d) repealed, (SB 10-212), ch. 412, pp. 2040, 2032, §§ 22, 1, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(6.5)(a) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1183, § 114, effective August 10.

L. 2013:

IP(6)(b) amended, (SB 13-048), ch. 138, p. 450, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(6.4) added, (SB 18-001), ch. 353, p. 2099, § 5, effective May 31.

L. 2019:

(6.5)(a) amended and (6.7) added, (SB 19-262), ch. 431, p. 3740, § 2, effective June 3.

L. 2020:

(7)(b) repealed, (SB 20-136), ch. 70, p. 286, § 17, effective September 14.

L. 2021:

IP(6) and IP(6)(b) amended and (6.8) added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1417, § 33, effective June 17; (5.5)(a) amended, (HB 21-1322), ch. 453, p. 3020, § 13, effective January 1, 2022; (5.5)(c) amended, (SB 21-257), ch. 478, p. 3420, § 4, effective July 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

IP(6.8)(c) amended, (HB 22-1351), ch. 159, p. 1004, § 3, effective May 16; IP(6.8)(c) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2988, § 96, effective August 10.

43-4-206. State allocation.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (1)(b)(V), (2), and (3) of this section, after paying the costs of the Colorado state patrol and any other costs of the department, exclusive of highway construction, highway improvements, or highway maintenance, that are appropriated by the general assembly, money in the highway users tax fund shall be paid to the state highway fund and expended for the following purposes:

The state highway fund shall be subject to the sinking fund and bond lien provided by part 2 of article 3 of this title.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, all money in the state highway fund not required for the creation, maintenance, and application of the highway anticipation or sinking fund and all money in the state highway supplementary fund are available to pay for:

All salaries, wages, and necessary traveling and other expenses of all persons connected with the department of transportation;

All equipment, furniture, and supplies for officers, division offices, and laboratories as may be established by the director of the highway maintenance division;

All incidental office expenses, including telegraph, telephone, postal, express charges, and expenses for printing, stationery, and advertising and for the publication of the quarterly bulletin;

All machines, tools, or other equipment necessary for the furtherance of the work of the department of transportation and also land and buildings for the housing and use of the same;

The construction, reconstruction, repairs, improvement, planning, supervision, and maintenance of the state highway system and other public highways, including any county and municipal roads and highways, together with the acquisition of rights-of-way and access rights for the same. Any proceeds of financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements executed as required by section

24-82-1303 (2)(a)

that are credited to the state highway fund pursuant to section

24-82-1303 (4)(b)

shall be used only for qualified federal aid highway projects that are included in the strategic transportation project investment program of the department of transportation and that are designated for tier 1 funding as ten-year development program projects on the department's development program project list, with at least twenty-five percent of the money being used for projects that are located in counties with populations of fifty thousand or less as of July 2015 as reported by the state demography office of the department of local affairs. No more than ninety percent of the proceeds shall be expended for highway purposes or highway-related capital improvements, and at least ten percent of the proceeds shall be expended for transit purposes or for transit-related capital improvements.

(V.5) Repealed.

(V.7) (A) The payment of statewide indirect costs in accordance with section

43-1-113 (8)

.

(B) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2005, p. 297, § 62, effective August 8, 2005.)

All land damages incurred by reason of establishing, opening, altering, relocating, widening, or abandoning portions of any part of the state highway system;

The payment of just compensation for advertising devices required to be removed under the provisions of section

43-1-414 (2)

.

Revenue accrued to and transferred to the highway users tax fund pursuant to section

39-26-123 (4)(a)

or appropriated to the highway users tax fund pursuant to House Bill 02-1389, enacted at the second regular session of the sixty-third general assembly, and credited to the state highway fund pursuant to section

43-4-205

(6.5) shall be expended by the department of transportation for the implementation of the strategic transportation project investment program:

(I) No more than ninety percent of such revenues shall be expended for highway purposes or highway-related capital improvements, including, but not limited to, high occupancy vehicle lanes, park-and-ride facilities, and transportation management systems, and at least ten percent of such revenues shall be expended for transit purposes or for transit-related capital improvements.

(II) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 1741, § 1, effective June 1, 2000.)

Notwithstanding section

24-1-136

(11)(a)(I), beginning in 1998, the department of transportation shall report annually to the transportation committee of the senate and the transportation and energy committee of the house of representatives concerning the revenue expended by the department pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section and, beginning in 2019, any net proceeds of financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements executed as required by section

24-82-1303 (2)(a)

that are credited to the state highway fund pursuant to section

24-82-1303 (4)(b)

and expended by the department pursuant to subsection (1)(b)(V) of this section. The department shall present the report at the joint meeting required under section

43-1-113 (9)(a)

, and the report shall describe for each fiscal year, if applicable:

The projects on which the revenue and net proceeds are to be expended, including the estimated cost of each project, the aggregate amount of revenue actually spent on each project, and the amount of revenue allocated for each project in such fiscal year. The department of transportation shall submit a prioritized list of such projects as part of the report.

The status of such projects that the department has undertaken in any previous fiscal year;

The projected amounts of revenue and net proceeds that the department expects to receive under this subsection (2) and section

24-82-1303 (4)(b)

during the fiscal year;

The amount of revenue and net proceeds that the department has already received under this subsection (2) and section 24-82-1303 (4)(b) during the fiscal year; and

How the revenue and net proceeds expended under this subsection (2) and subsection (1)(b)(V) of this section during the fiscal year relate to the total funding of the federal aid transportation projects that are included in the strategic transportation project investment program.

Beginning with the 1997-98 fiscal year, the department of transportation shall report annually to the joint budget committee at the department's hearing to review the department's budget request. The report shall contain for each fiscal year, if applicable, the reporting requirements specified in subparagraphs (I) to (V) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (2).

Repealed.

The revenue credited to the highway users tax fund pursuant to section 43-4-205 (6.3) shall be expended by the department of transportation only for road safety projects, as defined in section 43-4-803 (21); except that the department shall, in furtherance of its duty to supervise state highways and as a consequence in compliance with section 43-4-810, expend ten million dollars per year of the revenues for the planning, designing, engineering, acquisition, installation, construction, repair, reconstruction, maintenance, operation, or administration of transit-related projects, including, but not limited to, designated bicycle or pedestrian lanes of highway and infrastructure needed to integrate different transportation modes within a multimodal transportation system, that enhance the safety of state highways for transit users.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 503, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 120-12-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-12-6.

L. 65:

p. 930, § 5.

L. 71:

p. 1135, § 5.

L. 79:

IP(1)(b) amended, p. 1608, § 1, effective May 18; IP(1) amended, p. 1471, § 3, effective July 6; IP(1) amended, p. 1667, § 141, effective July 19.

L. 85:

(1)(b)(VII) amended, p. 1371, § 48, effective June 28.

L. 87:

IP(1) amended, p. 1556, § 6, effective July 1; (1)(b)(V.5) added, p. 1548, § 3, effective July 3.

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

(1)(b)(V) amended, p. 66, § 23, effective August 1.

L. 91:

(1)(b)(I), (1)(b)(II), (1)(b)(IV), and (1)(b)(V.5) amended and (1)(b)(V.7) added, p. 1126, § 200, effective July 1.

L. 93:

IP(1) amended, p. 1798, § 108, effective June 6.

L. 97:

IP(1) and IP(1)(b) amended and (2) added, p. 1533, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(2)(d) amended, p. 906, § 5, effective May 26.

L. 99:

(2)(d) repealed, p. 562, § 3, effective May 7.

L. 2000:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1741, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

IP(2)(a) amended, p. 146, § 4, effective March 27; (2)(a)(I) amended, p. 738, § 9, effective August 7; (2)(a)(I) amended, p. 718, § 9, effective August 7.

L. 2003:

IP(1) amended, p. 1702, § 12, effective May 14.

L. 2005:

(1)(a) and (1)(b)(V.7)(B) amended, p. 297, § 62, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

IP(2)(a) amended, p. 1604, § 7, effective July 2.

L. 2009:

(3) added, (SB 09-108), ch. 5, p. 55, § 19, effective March 2; IP(2)(a) amended, (SB 09-228), ch. 410, p. 2270, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

IP(1)(b) and (1)(b)(II) amended, (HB 15-1209), ch. 64, p. 178, § 12, effective March 30.

L. 2017:

IP(1), IP(1)(b), (1)(b)(V), IP(2)(a), (2)(b), and (3) amended, (SB 17-267), ch. 267, p. 1473, § 31, effective May 30.

L. 2018:

IP(1), IP(2)(b), (2)(b)(III), and (2)(b)(IV) amended, (SB 18-001), ch. 353, p. 2099, § 6, effective May 31; IP(2)(b) amended, (HB 18-1137), ch. 84, p. 683, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2020:

IP(2)(b) amended, (HB 20-1402), ch. 216, p. 1059, § 73, effective June 30.

L. 2021:

IP(2)(b), (2)(b)(III), and (2)(b)(IV) amended, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1418, § 34, effective June 17; (1)(b)(V) and IP(2)(b) amended, (HB 21-1316), ch. 325, p. 2063, § 80, effective July 1.